Washington statutes.
RCW 4.52.030

Enforcement of judgment—Appeal.

The judgment may be enforced in the same manner as if it had been rendered in an action, and shall be in the same manner subject to appeal.

[Code 1881 s 300; 1877 p 61 s 304; 1869 p 74 s 302; RRS s 380.]